Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1706
Felonies; recognizance; amount; endorsement on warrant.

The clerk issuing a warrant on such an indictment shall endorse thereon the sum in which the recognizance of the accused was ordered as aforesaid to be taken.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 431, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9075;

C.S.1922, § 10099;

C.S.1929, § 29-1706;

R.S.1943, § 29-1706.